Utah statutes.
76-10-1109.   Confidence game -- Punishment as for theft -- Description in charge.

(1) Any person who obtains or attempts to obtain from any other person any money or property by any means, instrument or device commonly called a confidence game shall be punished as in the case of theft of property of like value.

(2)  In every indictment, information, or complaint under this section, it shall be deemed and held a sufficient description of the offense to charge that the accused did, on, ____ (insert the date) unlawfully and knowingly obtain or attempt to obtain (as the case may be) from ____, (insert the name of the person or persons defrauded or attempted to be defrauded) his money or property (as the case may be) by means and by use of a confidence game.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

